Hawaii statutes.
§425E-811 Appeal from denial of
reinstatement. (a) If the director denies a limited
partnership's application for reinstatement following administrative
cancellation, the director shall notify the limited partnership of the reason
or reasons for the denial.

(b) The limited partnership may appeal the
denial of reinstatement to the circuit court within thirty days after the
mailing of the notice of denial. The limited partnership may appeal by
petitioning the court to set aside the cancellation and attaching to the
petition copies of the director's declaration of cancellation the limited
partnership's application for reinstatement, and the director's notice of
denial.

(c) The court may summarily order the director
to reinstate the administratively canceled limited partnership or may take
other action the court considers appropriate.

(d) The court's final decision may be appealed
as in other civil proceedings. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 184, §26;
am L 2008, c 54, §8]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next